California, session 20252026, AB2502.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23152.1 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:23152.1. For the purposes of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code, and Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, “drive” includes the volitional movement of a vehicle with a Level 0, Level 1, Level 2, or Level 3, of driving automation, as those levels are defined by the Society of Automotive Engineers. driver support features engaged that require a person to supervise the vehicle in order to steer, brake, or accelerate, as needed to maintain safety. This includes driver support features that require constant supervision and those that require a person to take direct control of the vehicle upon the request of the driver support feature.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.